Nevada, session 83, SB405.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 407A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. The Transit-to-Trails Task Force is hereby
created.
2. The Task Force consists of the following members
appointed by the Legislative Commission:
(a) One member who represents the Office of the Governor;
(b) One member who represents a law enforcement agency in
this State;
(c) One member who represents a regional transportation
commission in a county whose population is 100,000 or more but
less than 700,000;
(d) One member who represents a regional transportation
commission in a county whose population is 700,000 or more;
(e) One member who represents a county whose population is
less than 100,000;
(f) One member who represents the Division;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(g) Two members who represent the public and who have an
interest in outdoor recreation and transportation;
(h) One member who represents an advocacy group relating to
transportation and outdoor recreation;
(i) One member who represents the Tahoe Transportation
District;
(j) One member who represents the United States Bureau of
Land Management;
(k) One member who represents the United States Forest
Service; and
(l) One member who represents the United States National
Park Service.
3. The members of the Task Force shall serve a term of 4
years. A member may be reappointed to the Task Force and any
vacancy must be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment.
4. The members of the Task Force serve without
compensation and are not entitled to the per diem or travel
expenses provided to state officers generally.
5. The Task Force shall meet on a quarterly basis. At the first
meeting of the Task Force, the members of the Task Force shall
elect a Chair and Vice Chair from among its members.
6. A majority of the members of the Task Force constitutes a
quorum for the transaction of business, and a majority of those
members present at any meeting is sufficient for any official
action taken by the Task Force.
Sec. 3. The Transit-to-Trails Task Force created by section 2
of this act shall:
1. Identify high-priority areas for a program to provide or
expand access to outdoor recreation areas in this State, using
public transit, based on the need for transportation infrastructure
to improve access to outdoor recreation for communities with
limited transportation or parking, with public safety concerns or
where the weather of the community makes public transportation
a better option for outdoor recreation access; and
2. Identify and apply for grants of money from the Federal
Government and private entities for the expansion of public transit
that runs to outdoor recreation areas in this State, including,
without limitation, in the high-priority areas identified pursuant to
subsection 1.
Sec. 4. NRS 407A.500 is hereby amended to read as follows:
407A.500 As used in NRS 407A.500 to 407A.620, inclusive,
and sections 2 and 3 of this act, unless the context otherwise
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 407A.510, 407A.515
and 407A.525 have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 5. The Transit-to-Trails Task Force created by section 2
of this act shall prepare and submit a written report to the Director
of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Growth and Infrastructure describing the
activities, findings and conclusions of the Task Force and any
recommendations for legislation not later than August 31 of each
even-numbered year.
Sec. 6. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
Sec. 7. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025, and expires
by limitation on October 1, 2030.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)